Maryland, session 2025, HB0348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
4–401.
Except as provided in § 4–402 of this subtitle, and subject to the venue provisions of
Title 6 of this article, the District Court has exclusive original civil jurisdiction in:
(13) A proceeding for a civil infraction under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3
of the Transportation Article or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article;
7–301.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the
court costs in a traffic case, including parking and impounding cases, cases under §
21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1414, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article in which costs are imposed, and cases under § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article
in which costs are imposed:
(i) Are $22.50; and
(ii) Shall also be applicable to those cases in which the defendant
elects to waive the defendant’s right to trial and pay the fine or penalty deposit established
by the Chief Judge of the District Court by administrative regulation.

HOUSE BILL 348 3
(f) (1) This subsection does not apply to a traffic case under § 21–202.1, §
21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or § 21–1414 of the Transportation Article or to a parking
or impounding case.
(2) In a traffic case under subsection (a)(1) of this section the court shall
add a $7.50 surcharge to any fine imposed by the court.
7–302.
(e) (1) (i) A citation issued pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1,
§ 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article shall provide that the person receiving the citation may elect to stand trial by
notifying the issuing agency of the person’s intention to stand trial at least 5 days prior to
the date of payment as set forth in the citation.
(ii) On receipt of the notice to stand trial, the agency shall forward
to the District Court having venue a copy of the citation and a copy of the notice from the
person who received the citation indicating the person’s intention to stand trial.
(iii) On receipt thereof, the District Court shall schedule the case for
trial and notify the defendant of the trial date under procedures adopted by the Chief Judge
of the District Court.
(2) (i) A citation issued as the result of a vehicle height monitoring
system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a speed monitoring system, a work zone
speed control system or a stop sign monitoring system controlled by a political subdivision,
a school bus monitoring camera, a bus lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement
monitoring system shall provide that, in an uncontested case, the penalty shall be paid
directly to that political subdivision.
(ii) A citation issued as the result of a traffic control signal
monitoring system [or], a work zone speed control system, OR A SAFETY CORRIDOR
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM controlled by a State agency, or as a result of a vehicle
height monitoring system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a speed monitoring
system, a stop sign monitoring system, a school bus monitoring camera, a bus lane
monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system in a case contested in District
Court, shall provide that the penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court.
(3) Civil penalties resulting from citations issued using a vehicle height
monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring system,
work zone speed control system, SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM, stop
sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring camera, bus lane monitoring system, or a
noise abatement monitoring system that are collected by the District Court shall be
collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and distributed in accordance
with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
10–311.

HOUSE BILL 348
(b) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a speed monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–809 [or], § 21–810, OR § 21–810.1 of the Transportation Article is
admissible in a proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a
violation of Title 21, Subtitle 8 of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(h) In any other judicial proceeding, a recorded image produced by a vehicle
height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring
system, work zone speed control system, SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring camera, or bus lane
monitoring system or a recorded image and any relevant recorded audio produced by a noise
abatement monitoring system in conjunction with a noise measuring device is admissible
as otherwise provided by law.
Article – General Provisions
4–321.
(a) In this section, “recorded images” has the meaning stated in § 21–202.1, §
21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a custodian shall deny
inspection of recorded images produced by:
(1) a traffic control signal monitoring system operated under § 21–202.1 of
the Transportation Article;
(2) a speed monitoring system operated under § 21–809 of the
Transportation Article;
(3) a work zone speed control system operated under § 21–810 of the
Transportation Article; [or]
(4) A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED
UNDER § 21–810.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; OR
[(4)] (5) a vehicle height monitoring system operated under § 24–111.3 of
the Transportation Article.
(c) A custodian shall allow inspection of recorded images:
(1) as required in § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or §
24–111.3 of the Transportation Article;

HOUSE BILL 348 5
(2) by any person issued a citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, §
21–810.1, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article, or by an attorney of record for the
person; or
(3) by an employee or agent of an agency in an investigation or a proceeding
relating to the imposition of or indemnification from civil liability under § 21–202.1, §
21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
Article – Insurance
11–215.
(e) For purposes of reclassifying an insured in a classification that entails a
higher premium, an insurer under an automobile insurance policy may not consider a
probation before judgment disposition of a motor vehicle law offense, a civil penalty imposed
pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or a first offense of driving with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or
more under § 16–205.1 of the Transportation Article on record with the Motor Vehicle
Administration, as provided in § 16–117(b) of the Transportation Article.
11–318.
(e) For purposes of reclassifying an insured in a classification that entails a
higher premium, an insurer under an automobile insurance policy may not consider a
probation before judgment disposition of a motor vehicle law offense, a civil penalty imposed
pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or a first offense of driving with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or
more under § 16–205.1 of the Transportation Article on record with the Motor Vehicle
Administration, as provided in § 16–117(b) of the Transportation Article.
Article – Transportation
12–118.
(c) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this
subsection, notwithstanding any other law and in addition to any other exceptions provided
by law, all costs, fines, penalties, and forfeitures received by or paid to the District Court
under the Maryland Vehicle Law shall be collected and remitted as provided in the Courts
Article.
(2) The Comptroller shall distribute revenue from the civil fines collected
through use of a work zone speed control system controlled by a State agency under §
21–810 of this article to a special fund, to be used only as provided in subsection (e) of this
section.

HOUSE BILL 348
(3) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE REVENUE FROM THE
CIVIL FINES COLLECTED THROUGH USE OF A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER § 21–810.1 OF THIS ARTICLE TO A SPECIAL FUND TO
BE USED ONLY AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) MONEY IN THE SPECIAL FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3)
OF THIS SECTION:
(1) SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED FIRST TO THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION TO COVER THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING AND ADMINISTERING
SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS; AND
(2) AFTER THE DISTRIBUTION UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE REMAINING BALANCE SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE TRANSPORTATION
TRUST FUND FOR:
(I) HIGHWAY SAFETY PURPOSES; AND
(II) STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SYSTEM
PRESERVATION.
21–810.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “OWNER” MEANS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE OR A LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6 MONTHS OR
LONGER.
(II) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL OR LEASING COMPANY;
OR
2. A HOLDER OF A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE
ISSUED UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9, PART III OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “RECORDED IMAGE” MEANS AN IMAGE RECORDED BY A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) ON:

HOUSE BILL 348 7
1. A PHOTOGRAPH;
2. A MICROPHOTOGRAPH;
3. AN ELECTRONIC IMAGE;
4. VIDEOTAPE; OR
5. ANY OTHER MEDIUM; AND
(II) SHOWING:
1. THE REAR OF A MOTOR VEHICLE;
2. AT LEAST TWO TIME–STAMPED IMAGES OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE THAT INCLUDE THE SAME STATIONARY OBJECT NEAR THE MOTOR
VEHICLE; AND
3. ON AT LEAST ONE IMAGE OR PORTION OF TAPE, A
CLEAR AND LEGIBLE IDENTIFICATION OF THE ENTIRE REGISTRATION PLATE
NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(4) “SAFETY CORRIDOR” MEANS A SEGMENT OF A STATE HIGHWAY
THAT IS IDENTIFIED BY THE ADMINISTRATION AS:
(I) AN AREA OF HIGH RISK TO VULNERABLE ROAD USERS IN A
VULNERABLE ROAD USER SAFETY ASSESSMENT PREPARED UNDER 23 U.S.C. § 148;
OR
(II) A PRIORITY CORRIDOR IN THE ADMINISTRATION’S
PEDESTRIAN SAFETY ACTION PLAN.
(5) “SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM” MEANS ANY FIXED, MOBILE,
MANNED, OR UNMANNED DEVICE WITH ONE OR MORE MOTOR VEHICLE SENSORS
PRODUCING RECORDED IMAGES OF MOTOR VEHICLES TRAVELING AT SPEEDS AT
LEAST 12 MILES PER HOUR ABOVE THE POSTED SPEED LIMIT.
(6) “SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR” MEANS A
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR THAT OPERATES
A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM.
(7) (I) “VULNERABLE ROAD USER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL ON A
HIGHWAY WHO IS NOT TRAVELING IN A MOTOR VEHICLE.

HOUSE BILL 348
(II) “VULNERABLE ROAD USER” INCLUDES PEDESTRIANS,
BICYCLISTS, OTHER CYCLISTS, PERSONS USING PERSONAL CONVEYANCE OR A
MOBILITY DEVICE SUCH AS A WHEELCHAIR, AND PERSONS ON FOOT IN A HIGHWAY
WORK ZONE.
(B) (1) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION AND USED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS
CONTRACTOR TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF MOTOR VEHICLES TRAVELING ON A
STATE HIGHWAY WITHIN A SAFETY CORRIDOR.
(2) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE USED ONLY IF, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND MANUAL ON UNIFORM TRAFFIC CONTROL
DEVICES, A CONSPICUOUS ROAD SIGN IS PLACED AT A REASONABLE DISTANCE
CONSISTENT WITH NATIONAL GUIDELINES BEFORE THE SAFETY CORRIDOR
ALERTING DRIVERS THAT A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE IN OPERATION IN
THE SAFETY CORRIDOR.
(3) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE USED ONLY TO RECORD
THE IMAGES OF VEHICLES THAT ARE TRAVELING AT SPEEDS AT LEAST 12 MILES PER
HOUR ABOVE THE POSTED SPEED LIMIT.
(4) (I) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM SHALL UNDERGO AN
ANNUAL CALIBRATION CHECK PERFORMED BY AN INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION
LABORATORY.
(II) THE INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION LABORATORY SHALL
ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE OF CALIBRATION AFTER THE ANNUAL CALIBRATION
CHECK THAT:
1. SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
2. SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(5) IF THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR
MOVES OR PLACES A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM TO OR AT A SAFETY CORRIDOR
WHERE A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM HAD NOT PREVIOUSLY BEEN MOVED OR
PLACED WITHIN THE PREVIOUS YEAR, CITATIONS MAY NOT BE ISSUED FOR A
VIOLATION RECORDED BY THAT SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM:

HOUSE BILL 348 9
(I) UNTIL SIGNAGE IS INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION; AND
(II) FOR AT LEAST THE FIRST 15 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE
SIGNAGE IS INSTALLED.
(6) THE PROCUREMENT OF OR RELATING TO A SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL BE CONDUCTED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 1 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(C) (1) UNLESS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE RECEIVED A
CITATION FROM A POLICE OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER
OR, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION, THE DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IF AN IMAGE OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE IS RECORDED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM WHILE BEING OPERATED
IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $40.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL:
(I) PRESCRIBE A UNIFORM CITATION FORM CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–302 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; AND
(II) INDICATE ON THE CITATION THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL
PENALTY TO BE PAID BY PERSONS WHO CHOOSE TO PREPAY THE CIVIL PENALTY
WITHOUT APPEARING IN DISTRICT COURT.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR SHALL
MAIL TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION A CITATION
THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(II) THE REGISTRATION NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE VIOLATION CHARGED;
(IV) THE LOCATION WHERE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED;

HOUSE BILL 348
(V) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(VI) AT LEAST ONE RECORDED IMAGE OF THE VEHICLE WITH A
DATA BAR IMPRINTED ON THE IMAGE THAT INCLUDES THE SPEED OF THE VEHICLE
AND THE DATE AND TIME THE IMAGE WAS RECORDED;
(VII) THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH THE CIVIL PENALTY MUST BE PAID;
(VIII) A SIGNED STATEMENT UNDER OATH BY AN AUTHORIZED
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION REPRESENTATIVE OR CONTRACTOR THAT,
BASED ON INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES, THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS BEING
OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(IX) A STATEMENT THAT RECORDED IMAGES ARE EVIDENCE OF
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(X) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION OF THE MANNER AND TIME IN WHICH LIABILITY AS
ALLEGED IN THE CITATION MAY BE CONTESTED IN THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
(XI) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER:
1. IS AN ADMISSION OF LIABILITY;
2. MAY RESULT IN THE REFUSAL TO REGISTER THE
MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
3. MAY RESULT IN THE SUSPENSION OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE REGISTRATION.
(2) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR
MAY MAIL A WARNING NOTICE INSTEAD OF A CITATION TO THE OWNER LIABLE
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION,
THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR MAY NOT MAIL A
CITATION TO A PERSON WHO IS NOT AN OWNER.

HOUSE BILL 348 11
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION, A
CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2
WEEKS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN THIS
STATE, AND NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE
VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE.
(5) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY:
(I) PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
INSTRUCTIONS ON THE CITATION; OR
(II) ELECT TO STAND TRIAL IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(E) (1) A CERTIFICATE ALLEGING THAT THE VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE OCCURRED AND THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION HAVE BEEN SATISFIED, SWORN TO, OR AFFIRMED BY AN AUTHORIZED
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION REPRESENTATIVE OR CONTRACTOR, BASED ON
INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES PRODUCED BY A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM,
SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF THE FACTS CONTAINED IN THE CERTIFICATE AND SHALL BE
ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING ALLEGING A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SECTION
WITHOUT THE PRESENCE OR TESTIMONY OF THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR.
(2) IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVED A CITATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION DESIRES THE SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR TO BE
PRESENT AND TESTIFY AT TRIAL, THE PERSON SHALL NOTIFY THE COURT AND THE
REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR
THAT ISSUED THE CITATION IN WRITING NOT LATER THAN 20 DAYS BEFORE TRIAL.
(3) ADJUDICATION OF LIABILITY SHALL BE BASED ON A
PREPONDERANCE OF EVIDENCE.
(F) (1) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY CONSIDER IN DEFENSE OF A
VIOLATION:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT
THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL
OR POSSESSION OF THE VEHICLE OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION;

HOUSE BILL 348
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ISSUES AND EVIDENCE THAT THE DISTRICT
COURT DEEMS PERTINENT.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF
THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER SHALL SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT
REGARDING THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN
A TIMELY MANNER.
(3) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION SHALL PROVIDE
TO THE DISTRICT COURT A LETTER, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY THE PERSON AND
MAILED BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, THAT:
(I) STATES THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS
NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(II) INCLUDES ANY OTHER CORROBORATING EVIDENCE.
(4) (I) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT THE PERSON NAMED
IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION OR RECEIVES EVIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION
IDENTIFYING THE PERSON DRIVING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION,
THE CLERK OF THE COURT MAY PROVIDE TO THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION REPRESENTATIVE OR CONTRACTOR THAT ISSUED THE CITATION
A COPY OF ANY EVIDENCE SUBSTANTIATING WHO WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT
THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF SUBSTANTIATING EVIDENCE FROM THE
DISTRICT COURT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION REPRESENTATIVE OR CONTRACTOR THAT ISSUED THE
CITATION MAY ISSUE A CITATION AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION
TO THE PERSON WHO THE EVIDENCE INDICATES WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT
THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(III) ANY CITATION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
EVIDENCE FROM THE DISTRICT COURT.

HOUSE BILL 348 13
(G) IF A PERSON LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT PAY THE CIVIL
PENALTY OR CONTEST THE VIOLATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
(1) REFUSE TO REGISTER OR REREGISTER THE REGISTRATION OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR THE VIOLATION; OR
(2) SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR
THE VIOLATION.
(H) A VIOLATION FOR WHICH A CIVIL PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(1) IS NOT A MOVING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSESSING
POINTS UNDER § 16–402 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) MAY NOT BE RECORDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ON THE
DRIVING RECORD OF THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF THE VEHICLE;
(3) MAY BE TREATED AS A PARKING VIOLATION FOR PURPOSES OF §
26–305 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(4) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED IN THE PROVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLE
INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(I) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, THE
CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF CITATIONS, THE TRIAL OF CIVIL VIOLATIONS, AND THE COLLECTION
OF CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(J) (1) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR A CONTRACTOR
DESIGNATED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADMINISTER AND
PROCESS CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IN COORDINATION WITH
THE DISTRICT COURT.
(2) IF A CONTRACTOR PROVIDES, DEPLOYS, OR OPERATES A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM FOR THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION, THE
CONTRACTOR’S FEE MAY NOT BE CONTINGENT ON THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS
ISSUED OR PAID.
(K) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHING STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES FOR SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS.

HOUSE BILL 348
26–305.
(a) The Administration may not register or transfer the registration of any vehicle
involved in a parking violation under this subtitle, a violation under any federal parking
regulation that applies to property in this State under the jurisdiction of the U.S.
government, a violation of § 21–202(h) of this article as determined under § 21–202.1 of this
article or Title 21, Subtitle 8 of this article as determined under § 21–809 [or], §
21–810, OR § 21–810.1 of this article, or a violation of the Illegal Dumping and Litter
Control Law under § 10–110 of the Criminal Law Article or a local law or ordinance adopted
by Baltimore City relating to the unlawful disposal of litter as determined under § 10–112
of the Criminal Law Article, if:
(1) It is notified by a political subdivision or authorized State agency that
the person cited for the violation under this subtitle, § 21–202.1, § 21–809, [or] § 21–810,
OR § 21–810.1 of this article, or § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has
failed to either:
(i) Pay the fine for the violation by the date specified in the citation;
or
(ii) File a notice of his intention to stand trial for the violation;
(2) It is notified by the District Court that a person who has elected to stand
trial for the violation under this subtitle, under § 21–202.1, § 21–809 [or], § 21–810, OR §
21–810.1 of this article, or under § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has
failed to appear for trial; or
(3) It is notified by a U.S. District Court that a person cited for a violation
under a federal parking regulation:
(i) Has failed to pay the fine for the violation by the date specified
in the federal citation; or
(ii) Either has failed to file a notice of the person’s intention to stand
trial for the violation, or, if electing to stand trial, has failed to appear for trial.
26–401.
If a person is taken before a District Court commissioner or is given a traffic citation
or a civil citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1414, or §
24–111.3 of this article containing a notice to appear in court, the commissioner or court
shall be one that sits within the county in which the offense allegedly was committed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.

HOUSE BILL 348 15
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.